Maryland, session 2025, SB0928.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
13–301.
Unfair, abusive, or deceptive trade practices include any:
(14) Violation of a provision of:
(xlii) Section 12–6C–09.1 of the Health Occupations Article; [or]
(xliii) Title 14, Subtitle 48 of this article; or
(XLIV) SECTION 9–905.1 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE; OR
(15) Act or omission that relates to a residential building and that is
chargeable as a misdemeanor under or otherwise violates a provision of the Energy
Conservation Building Standards Act, Title 7, Subtitle 4 of the Public Utilities Article.
Article – State Government
[9–905.1.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Advertisement” means:
(i) a written or printed communication made for the purpose of
soliciting business for veterans benefits appeals services;
(ii) a directory listing for a person that is offering veterans benefits
appeals services; or
(iii) a radio, television, computer network or airwave, or electronic
transmission that solicits business for or promotes a person offering veterans benefits
appeals services.

SENATE BILL 928 3
(3) “Veterans benefits appeals services” means any services that a veteran
might reasonably require in order to appeal a denial of federal, state, or local veterans
benefits, including denials of disability, limited income, home loan, insurance, education
and training, health care, burial and memorial, and dependent and survivor benefits.
(4) “Veterans benefits services” means any services a veteran or a family
member of a veteran might reasonably use in order to obtain federal, state, or local veterans
benefits.
(b) (1) Before entering into an agreement with an individual for the provision
of veterans benefits services or veterans benefits appeals services, a person who charges a
fee for those services shall:
(i) provide a written disclosure statement to each individual; and
(ii) obtain the individual’s signature on the written disclosure
statement acknowledging that the individual understands the disclosure statement.
(2) The written disclosure statement shall:
(i) be on a form approved by the Secretary; and
(ii) state that veterans benefits services and veterans benefits
appeals services are offered at no cost by the Department and other veterans services
organizations accredited by the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs.
(c) A person who charges a fee for providing veterans benefits appeals services
shall provide in any advertisement for appeals services notice that appeals services are also
offered at no cost by the Department and other veterans services organizations accredited
by the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs.
(d) (1) A person who violates the provisions of this section is subject to a civil
penalty of not more than $1,000 for each violation.
(2) Civil penalties shall be in an amount ordered by the District Court in
an action brought by the Attorney General.
(3) Each day a violation continues is a separate violation.
(4) Any civil penalty collected shall be deposited in the Maryland Veterans
Trust Fund.]
9–905.1.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.

SENATE BILL 928
(2) “COMPENSATION” MEANS PAYMENT OF MONEY, A THING OF
VALUE, OR A FINANCIAL BENEFIT.
(3) “V.A. ACCREDITED” MEANS AUTHORIZED BY THE U.S.
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS TO PROVIDE SERVICES IN ACCORDANCE WITH
38 C.F.R. § 14.629.
(4) “VETERANS BENEFITS MATTER” MEANS A CLAIM OR APPEAL
RELATING TO ANY BENEFIT, PROGRAM, SERVICE, COMMODITY, FUNCTION, OR
STATUS, TO WHICH ENTITLEMENT IS DETERMINED UNDER THE LAWS AND
REGULATIONS ADMINISTERED BY THE U.S. DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
OR THE U.S. DEPARTMENT OF DEFENSE PERTAINING TO VETERANS, THEIR
DEPENDENTS, THEIR SURVIVORS, AND ANY OTHER INDIVIDUAL ELIGIBLE FOR SUCH
BENEFITS.
(B) A PERSON THAT IS NOT V.A. ACCREDITED MAY NOT:
(1) EXCEPT AS AUTHORIZED UNDER FEDERAL LAW, RECEIVE
COMPENSATION FOR:
(I) PREPARING, PRESENTING, OR PROSECUTING A VETERANS
BENEFITS MATTER; OR
(II) ADVISING, CONSULTING, OR ASSISTING AN INDIVIDUAL
WITH REGARD TO A VETERANS BENEFITS MATTER;
(2) RECEIVE COMPENSATION FOR REFERRING AN INDIVIDUAL TO
ANOTHER PERSON FOR THE PREPARATION, PRESENTATION, OR PROSECUTION OF A
VETERANS BENEFITS MATTER OR ADVICE, CONSULTATION, OR ASSISTANCE WITH A
VETERANS BENEFITS MATTER; OR
(3) GUARANTEE, EITHER DIRECTLY OR BY IMPLICATION, THAT AN
INDIVIDUAL IS CERTAIN TO RECEIVE:
(I) SPECIFIC VETERANS BENEFITS; OR
(II) A SPECIFIC LEVEL, PERCENTAGE, OR AMOUNT OF
VETERANS BENEFITS.
(C) (1) A PERSON MAY NOT RECEIVE EXCESSIVE OR UNREASONABLE
FEES, AS DETERMINED IN ACCORDANCE WITH 38 C.F.R. § 14.636(E), AS
COMPENSATION FOR PREPARING, PRESENTING, OR PROSECUTING A VETERANS

SENATE BILL 928 5
BENEFITS MATTER OR ADVISING, CONSULTING, OR ASSISTING AN INDIVIDUAL WITH
A VETERANS BENEFITS MATTER.
(2) A PERSON SEEKING TO RECEIVE COMPENSATION FOR
PREPARING, PRESENTING, OR PROSECUTING A VETERANS BENEFITS MATTER OR
ADVISING, CONSULTING, OR ASSISTING AN INDIVIDUAL WITH A VETERANS BENEFITS
MATTER SHALL, BEFORE RENDERING ANY SERVICES, ENTER INTO A WRITTEN FEE
AGREEMENT, SIGNED BY BOTH PARTIES, THAT ADHERES TO ALL CRITERIA
SPECIFIED IN 38 C.F.R. § 14.636.
(D) (1) A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION:
(I) IS AN UNFAIR, ABUSIVE, OR DECEPTIVE TRADE PRACTICE
WITHIN THE MEANING OF TITLE 13 OF THE COMMERCIAL LAW ARTICLE; AND
(II) IS SUBJECT TO THE ENFORCEMENT AND PENALTY
PROVISIONS CONTAINED IN TITLE 13 OF THE COMMERCIAL LAW ARTICLE.
(2) ANY CIVIL OR ADMINISTRATIVE PENALTY COLLECTED BY THE
ATTORNEY GENERAL IN AN ACTION UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE DEPOSITED IN
THE MARYLAND VETERANS TRUST FUND.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.